District of Columbia statutes.
16-3522

Parties who may institute; ex rel. proceedings.

The United States attorney or the Corporation Counsel may institute a proceeding pursuant to this subchapter on his own motion, or on the relation of a third person. The writ may not be issued on the relation of a third person except by leave of the court, to be applied for by the relator, by a petition duly verified, setting forth the grounds of the application, or until the relator files a bond with sufficient surety, to be approved by the clerk of the court, in such penalty as the court prescribes, conditioned on the payment by him of all costs incurred in the prosecution of the writ if costs are not recovered from and paid by the defendant.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 562, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(n)
1973 Ed., § 16-3522.
1981 Ed., § 16-3522.
This section is referenced in § 16-3523.